Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.25, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 5, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 6-101.25), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.25. A. Whenever a superintendent decides to
recommend that a teacher or administrator employed within the school
district be dismissed or not reemployed, the superintendent shall
state the recommendation in writing, setting forth the basis for the
recommendation, and shall submit such recommendation to the board of
education.

If the teacher subject to such recommendation is a career
teacher, the recommendation shall specify the statutory grounds for
which the recommendation is based.
If the teacher subject to such recommendation is a probationary
teacher, the recommendation shall specify the cause for which the
recommendation is based.
The superintendent shall also specify the underlying facts
supporting the recommendation.
B. 1. If the recommendation includes grounds that could form
the basis of criminal charges sufficient to result in the denial or
revocation of a certificate for a reason set forth in subparagraph a
of paragraph 6 of subsection A of Section 3-104 of this title, or if
the recommendation includes a reason set forth in subparagraph a of
paragraph 6 of subsection A of Section 3-104 of this title and is
based on an agreement between the teacher or administrator and
school district to avoid civil litigation or a settlement of a civil
action unless the court orders the terms of such settlement to be
kept confidential, a copy of the recommendation shall also be
forwarded to the State Board of Education after the completion of
when the recommendation is made pursuant to the due process
procedures pursuant to provided for in Section 6-101.26 of this
title or after the teacher resigns, regardless of whether the
teacher or administrator resigns before or after a termination
recommendation is made, provided that the resignation occurs while
the teacher or administrator is under investigation for conduct that
could form the basis for criminal charges or certificate revocation.
A report of such resignation including any investigatory findings to
date shall be forwarded to the State Board of Education. Failure to
forward a copy of the recommendation to the State Board of Education
shall not be the basis for any claim or action against a public
school, its board of education, employees, agents, or other
representatives. If the school district forwards a copy of the
recommendation to the State Board of Education, the school district
shall contemporaneously forward a copy to the teacher or
administrator subject to such recommendation. The teacher or
administrator may provide supplementary information to the State
Board of Education.
2. If the investigation into the conduct of the teacher or
administrator concludes without findings to support criminal
charges, certificate revocation, or termination, the individual’s
report shall be expunged from State Board of Education records and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1075 Page 2

written notification of the clearance shall be sent to all affected
parties.
C. Only school districts may request a copy of the
recommendation from the State Board of Education, and only if a
teacher or administrator is being considered for new employment or a
teacher or administrator is currently employed by the requesting
school district. The State Board of Education shall notify the
teacher or administrator subject to the recommendation if such a
request is made and provide the identity of the school district that
made such request. The teacher or administrator subject to the
recommendation shall retain the right to provide supplementary
information to the State Board of Education to accompany any
documents requested. The State Board of Education shall provide the
requesting school district documents related to the recommendation
as well as any supplementary information provided by the teacher or
administrator subject to the recommendation, and copies shall be
contemporaneously forwarded to the teacher or administrator subject
to the recommendation. Records provided to a requesting school
district pursuant to this subsection shall be kept confidential.
D. Except as provided for in subsection C of this section, the
State Board of Education shall keep recommendations submitted
pursuant to subsection B of this section confidential. Records
created pursuant to this section shall not be subject to disclosure
under the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
E. If the State Board of Education or a school district that
generated or received documents pursuant to subsection C of this
section is served a subpoena requesting disclosure of the documents,
the teacher or administrator subject to the recommendation shall
immediately be notified and be provided the opportunity to object to
the subpoena.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1075 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1075 Page 4